Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III. OTHER PROVISIONS]

[§269-71] Meter tampering. Any person
who, without permission or authorization from a utility tampers with, damages,
destroys, removes, connects, causes to connect, disconnects, or causes to be
disconnected or bypassed any wire, cable, conductor, gas pipe, billing or
collection equipment, or device on any meter, line, conduit, property, or
facilities of a utility for the purpose of using unmetered services, in
addition to any other penalty authorized by law, shall be liable to the utility
for treble the amount of the value of the utility services used and the damages
or loss of any equipment, property, or facilities of a utility. [L 1982, c 94,
§1]

Cross References

Criminal tampering of a utility, see §§708-825 to 826.

Theft of utility services, see §708-839.5.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next